Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 84. Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery

§ 1581.
Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery Advisory Board.

The Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery Advisory Board is created to advise the Adjutant General on all matters relating to the establishment and operation of a Vermont veterans’ memorial cemetery to be known as the Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery. The Board shall consist of:

The Commissioner of the Department of Buildings and General Services, who shall serve as Chair of the Board.

One member of the Senate who shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees.

One member of the House who shall be appointed by the House Speaker.

Four individuals who represent veterans or are members of a veterans’ organization, to be appointed by the Governor for staggered terms of six years.

One individual who represents the Vermont granite, Vermont slate, or Vermont marble industry selected by the Governor for a six-year term.

For each meeting, legislative members shall be entitled to receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses as provided under

2 V.S.A. § 23(a)

. The members representing veterans or from veterans’ organizations shall be entitled to per diem as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

and their necessary and actual expenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 69

, § 1, eff. May 27, 1989; amended

1991, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. June 9, 1992;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1).

§ 1582.
Rules.

The Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery Advisory Board may adopt rules under the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 relating to acquisition of land; design of the cemetery, its buildings, and grave markers; eligibility for burial; and any other matters necessary to establish and maintain the Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 69

, § 1, eff. May 27, 1989.

§ 1583.
Adjutant General; powers and duties.

The Adjutant General, subject to available funds and with the advice of the Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery Advisory Committee, shall administer the creation, establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery.

The Adjutant General may accept unconditional gifts, grants of money, services, and facilities from any source, public or private, subject to the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 69

, § 1, eff. May 27, 1989.

§ 1584.
Cemetery location.

The Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery shall be located on approximately 100 acres of land, suitable for cemetery purposes, in the northerly portion of State-owned property known as the Langevin Farm in Randolph, Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 69

, § 1, eff. May 27, 1989.

§ 1585.
Cemetery design.

The Vermont Veterans’ Memorial Cemetery identified by section 1584 of this title shall be of contemporary design prepared by an experienced cemetery landscape architect, may accommodate approximately 1,000 graves per acre, and shall allow for freedom of choice by the family of a veteran, a veteran’s spouse, and a veteran’s minor child, who will be interred, of an upright or flat memorialization to mark the grave. Preference shall be given to the use of Vermont granite, Vermont slate, and Vermont marble for all memorialization. The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall request and facilitate the availability of memorialization from the U.S. Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 24a, eff. June 9, 1992; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1), eff. May 6, 1996;

2021, No. 20

, § 149.

§ 1586.
Interment of unclaimed remains of veterans.

The Vermont Veterans Memorial Cemetery shall accept and inter the unclaimed remains of an eligible veteran if:

a funeral director or crematory operator has determined pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 5227(c)(2)

that interment of the veteran’s remains in the Cemetery is appropriate; or

the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner has determined pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 5227(d)(4)

that interment of the veteran’s remains in the Cemetery is appropriate.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 9

, § 1, eff. April 23, 2019.